Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-150
Notice of surety bond; recording; contents.

(1) If a prime contractor or owner has secured a surety bond a notice of surety bond may be recorded.

(2) The notice shall be signed by the contractor or owner and by the surety company and state:

(a) The real estate being improved with a description thereof sufficient for identification;

(b) The names and addresses of the owner and the prime contractor;

(c) The name and address of the surety company and the name and address of a person on whom service of process may be made;

(d) The total sum of the bond and that the bond meets the requirements of section 52-141; and

(e) That the bond is for the purpose of relieving the real estate from construction liens arising under the contract between the named prime contractor and contracting owner.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 26.